Washington statutes.
RCW 4.64.090

Abstract of judgment.

The abstract of a judgment shall contain (1) the name of the party, or parties, in whose favor the judgment was rendered; (2) the name of the party, or parties, against whom the judgment was rendered; (3) the date of the rendition of the judgment; (4) the amount for which the judgment was rendered, and in the following manner, viz: Principal $. . . .; interest $. . . .; costs $. . . .; total $. . . . .

[ 1987 c 442 s 1113; 1957 c 7 s 8. Prior: 1929 c 60 s 3, part; 1893 c 42 s 3; RRS s 451.]